fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-macitan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - macitan -  adsf : # Ordinary VII verb, Wolvengrey VII1 p 393

     macitan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: macitan
     macitan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: macitanwa
     macitan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: macitaniniw
     macitan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: macitaniniwa

     PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [kî-macitan]
     PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [kî-macitanwa]
     PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [kî-macitaniniw]
     PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [kî-macitaniniwa]
     
     PV/ka+macitan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [ka-macitan]
     PV/ka+macitan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [ka-macitanwa]
     PV/ka+macitan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [ka-macitaniniw]
     PV/ka+macitan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [ka-macitaniniwa]
     
     PV/wî+macitan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [wî-macitan]
     PV/wî+macitan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [wî-macitanwa]
     PV/wî+macitan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [wî-macitaniniw]
     PV/wî+macitan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [wî-macitaniniwa]

     PV/ê+macitan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-macitahk]
     PV/ê+macitan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-macitahki]
     PV/ê+macitan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-macitaninik]  #Check
     PV/ê+macitan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-macitaniniki] # Check

     PV/ê+PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-kî-macitahk]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-kî-macitahki]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-kî-macitaninik] #Check
     PV/ê+PV/kî+macitan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-kî-macitaniniki] #Check

     macitan+V+II+Cond+3Sg: macitahki
     macitan+V+II+Cond+3Pl: macitahkwâwi
     macitan+V+II+Cond+4Sg: macitaniniki
     macitan+V+II+Cond+4Pl: macitaninikwâwi
